Dictionaries/dictionaries-master/sr/sr-Latn.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1461 Y 29
SFX 1461 ti ti
SFX 1461 ti dem
SFX 1461 ti deš
SFX 1461 ti de
SFX 1461 ti demo
SFX 1461 ti dete
SFX 1461 ti du
SFX 1461 ti nuo
SFX 1461 ti nula
SFX 1461 ti nulo
SFX 1461 ti nuli
SFX 1461 ti nule
SFX 1461 ti nuću
SFX 1461 ti nućeš
SFX 1461 ti nuće
SFX 1461 ti nućemo
SFX 1461 ti nućete
SFX 1461 ti nuće
SFX 1461 ti ni
SFX 1461 ti nimo
SFX 1461 ti nite
SFX 1461 ti nuh
SFX 1461 ti nu
SFX 1461 ti nuše
SFX 1461 ti nusmo
SFX 1461 ti nuste
SFX 1461 ti njahu
SFX 1461 ti nući
SFX 1461 ti nuvši

SFX 1462 Y 28
SFX 1462 lati lati
SFX 1462 lati lam
SFX 1462 lati laš
SFX 1462 lati la
SFX 1462 lati lamo
SFX 1462 lati late
SFX 1462 lati laju
SFX 1462 lati lao
SFX 1462 lati lala
SFX 1462 lati lalo
SFX 1462 lati lali
SFX 1462 lati lale
SFX 1462 lati laću
SFX 1462 lati laćeš
SFX 1462 lati laće
SFX 1462 lati laćemo
SFX 1462 lati laćete
SFX 1462 lati laće
SFX 1462 lati laj
SFX 1462 lati lajmo
SFX 1462 lati lajte
SFX 1462 lati lah
SFX 1462 lati la
SFX 1462 lati laše
SFX 1462 lati lasmo
SFX 1462 lati laste
SFX 1462 lati ljahu
SFX 1462 lati lavši

SFX 1463 Y 28
SFX 1463 ći ći
SFX 1463 ći gnem
SFX 1463 ći gneš
SFX 1463 ći gne
SFX 1463 ći gnemo
SFX 1463 ći gnete
SFX 1463 ći gnu
SFX 1463 ći gao
SFX 1463 ći gla
SFX 1463 ći glo
SFX 1463 ći gli
SFX 1463 ći gle
SFX 1463 ći gnuću
SFX 1463 ći gnućeš
SFX 1463 ći gnuće
SFX 1463 ći gnućemo
SFX 1463 ći gnućete
SFX 1463 ći gnuće
SFX 1463 ći gni
SFX 1463 ći gnimo
SFX 1463 ći gnite
SFX 1463 ći goh
SFX 1463 ći že
SFX 1463 ći goše
SFX 1463 ći gosmo
SFX 1463 ći goste
SFX 1463 ći gohu
SFX 1463 ći gavši

SFX 1464 Y 39
SFX 1464 sti sti
SFX 1464 sti nem
SFX 1464 sti neš
SFX 1464 sti ne
SFX 1464 sti nemo
SFX 1464 sti nete
SFX 1464 sti nu
SFX 1464 sti dem
SFX 1464 sti deš
SFX 1464 sti de
SFX 1464 sti demo
SFX 1464 sti dete
SFX 1464 sti du
SFX 1464 sti o
SFX 1464 sti la
SFX 1464 sti lo
SFX 1464 sti li
SFX 1464 sti le
SFX 1464 sti ću
SFX 1464 sti ćeš
SFX 1464 sti će
SFX 1464 sti ćemo
SFX 1464 sti ćete
SFX 1464 sti će
SFX 1464 sti ni
SFX 1464 sti nimo
SFX 1464 sti nite
SFX 1464 sti nuh
SFX 1464 sti nuše
SFX 1464 sti nusmo
SFX 1464 sti nuste
SFX 1464 sti doh
SFX 1464 sti doše
SFX 1464 sti dosmo
SFX 1464 sti doste
SFX 1464 sti đahu
SFX 1464 sti deći
SFX 1464 sti nući
SFX 1464 sti vši

SFX 1465 Y 29
SFX 1465 jeti jeti
SFX 1465 jeti jenem
SFX 1465 jeti jeneš
SFX 1465 jeti jene
SFX 1465 jeti jenemo
SFX 1465 jeti jenete
SFX 1465 jeti jenu
SFX 1465 jeti io
SFX 1465 jeti jela
SFX 1465 jeti jelo
SFX 1465 jeti jeli
SFX 1465 jeti jele
SFX 1465 jeti jeću
SFX 1465 jeti jećeš
SFX 1465 jeti jeće
SFX 1465 jeti jećemo
SFX 1465 jeti jećete
SFX 1465 jeti jeće
SFX 1465 jeti i
SFX 1465 jeti imo
SFX 1465 jeti ite
SFX 1465 jeti jeh
SFX 1465 jeti je
SFX 1465 jeti ješe
SFX 1465 jeti jesmo
SFX 1465 jeti jeste
SFX 1465 jeti enjahu
SFX 1465 jeti jenući
SFX 1465 jeti jevši

SFX 1466 Y 28
SFX 1466 ati ati
SFX 1466 ati im
SFX 1466 ati iš
SFX 1466 ati i
SFX 1466 ati imo
SFX 1466 ati ite
SFX 1466 ati e
SFX 1466 ati ao
SFX 1466 ati ala
SFX 1466 ati alo
SFX 1466 ati ali
SFX 1466 ati ale
SFX 1466 ati aću
SFX 1466 ati aćeš
SFX 1466 ati aće
SFX 1466 ati aćemo
SFX 1466 ati aćete
SFX 1466 ati aće
SFX 1466 ati i
SFX 1466 ati imo
SFX 1466 ati ite
SFX 1466 ati ah
SFX 1466 ati a
SFX 1466 ati aše
SFX 1466 ati asmo
SFX 1466 ati aste
SFX 1466 ati ahu
SFX 1466 ati avši

SFX 1467 Y 22
SFX 1467 ći ći
SFX 1467 ći gnem
SFX 1467 ći gneš
SFX 1467 ći gne
SFX 1467 ći gnemo
SFX 1467 ći gnete
SFX 1467 ći gnu
SFX 1467 ći gao
SFX 1467 ći gla
SFX 1467 ći glo
SFX 1467 ći gli
SFX 1467 ći gle
SFX 1467 ći gni
SFX 1467 ći gnimo
SFX 1467 ći gnite
SFX 1467 ći goh
SFX 1467 ći že
SFX 1467 ći goše
SFX 1467 ći gosmo
SFX 1467 ći goste
SFX 1467 ći gohu
SFX 1467 ći gavši

SFX 1468 Y 28
SFX 1468 iti iti
SFX 1468 iti ijem
SFX 1468 iti iješ
SFX 1468 iti ije
SFX 1468 iti ijemo
SFX 1468 iti ijete
SFX 1468 iti iju
SFX 1468 iti io
SFX 1468 iti ila
SFX 1468 iti ilo
SFX 1468 iti ili
SFX 1468 iti ile
SFX 1468 iti iću
SFX 1468 iti ićeš
SFX 1468 iti iće
SFX 1468 iti ićemo
SFX 1468 iti ićete
SFX 1468 iti iće
SFX 1468 iti ij
SFX 1468 iti ijmo
SFX 1468 iti ijte
SFX 1468 iti ih
SFX 1468 iti i
SFX 1468 iti iše
SFX 1468 iti ismo
SFX 1468 iti iste
SFX 1468 iti ihu
SFX 1468 iti ivši

SFX 1469 Y 28
SFX 1469 ći ći
SFX 1469 ći gnem
SFX 1469 ći gneš
SFX 1469 ći gne
SFX 1469 ći gnemo
SFX 1469 ći gnete
SFX 1469 ći gnu
SFX 1469 ći gao
SFX 1469 ći gla
SFX 1469 ći glo
SFX 1469 ći gli
SFX 1469 ći gle
SFX 1469 ći gnuću
SFX 1469 ći gnućeš
SFX 1469 ći gnuće
SFX 1469 ći gnućemo
SFX 1469 ći gnućete
SFX 1469 ći gnuće
SFX 1469 ći gni
SFX 1469 ći gnimo
SFX 1469 ći gnite
SFX 1469 ći goh
SFX 1469 ći že
SFX 1469 ći goše
SFX 1469 ći gosmo
SFX 1469 ći goste
SFX 1469 ći žahu
SFX 1469 ći gnuvši

SFX 1470 Y 28
SFX 1470 deti deti
SFX 1470 deti dim
SFX 1470 deti diš
SFX 1470 deti di
SFX 1470 deti dimo
SFX 1470 deti dite
SFX 1470 deti de
SFX 1470 deti deo
SFX 1470 deti dela
SFX 1470 deti delo
SFX 1470 deti deli
SFX 1470 deti dele
SFX 1470 deti deću
SFX 1470 deti dećeš
SFX 1470 deti deće
SFX 1470 deti dećemo
SFX 1470 deti dećete
SFX 1470 deti deće
SFX 1470 deti di
SFX 1470 deti dimo
SFX 1470 deti dite
SFX 1470 deti deh
SFX 1470 deti de
SFX 1470 deti deše
SFX 1470 deti desmo
SFX 1470 deti deste
SFX 1470 deti đahu
SFX 1470 deti devši

SFX 1471 Y 28
SFX 1471 jeti jeti
SFX 1471 jeti im
SFX 1471 jeti iš
SFX 1471 jeti i
SFX 1471 jeti imo
SFX 1471 jeti ite
SFX 1471 jeti e
SFX 1471 jeti io
SFX 1471 jeti jela
SFX 1471 jeti jelo
SFX 1471 jeti jeli
SFX 1471 jeti jele
SFX 1471 jeti jeću
SFX 1471 jeti jećeš
SFX 1471 jeti jeće
SFX 1471 jeti jećemo
SFX 1471 jeti jećete
SFX 1471 jeti jeće
SFX 1471 jeti i
SFX 1471 jeti imo
SFX 1471 jeti ite
SFX 1471 jeti jeh
SFX 1471 jeti je
SFX 1471 jeti ješe
SFX 1471 jeti jesmo
SFX 1471 jeti jeste
SFX 1471 jeti enjahu
SFX 1471 jeti jevši

SFX 1472 Y 28
SFX 1472 rati rati
SFX 1472 rati erem
SFX 1472 rati ereš
SFX 1472 rati ere
SFX 1472 rati eremo
SFX 1472 rati erete
SFX 1472 rati eru
SFX 1472 rati rao
SFX 1472 rati rala
SFX 1472 rati ralo
SFX 1472 rati rali
SFX 1472 rati rale
SFX 1472 rati raću
SFX 1472 rati raćeš
SFX 1472 rati raće
SFX 1472 rati raćemo
SFX 1472 rati raćete
SFX 1472 rati raće
SFX 1472 rati eri
SFX 1472 rati erimo
SFX 1472 rati erite
SFX 1472 rati rah
SFX 1472 rati ra
SFX 1472 rati raše
SFX 1472 rati rasmo
SFX 1472 rati raste
SFX 1472 rati rahu
SFX 1472 rati ravši

SFX 1473 Y 28
SFX 1473 jati jati
SFX 1473 jati jem
SFX 1473 jati ješ
SFX 1473 jati je
SFX 1473 jati jemo
SFX 1473 jati jete
SFX 1473 jati ju
SFX 1473 jati jao
SFX 1473 jati jala
SFX 1473 jati jalo
SFX 1473 jati jali
SFX 1473 jati jale
SFX 1473 jati jaću
SFX 1473 jati jaćeš
SFX 1473 jati jaće
SFX 1473 jati jaćemo
SFX 1473 jati jaćete
SFX 1473 jati jaće
SFX 1473 jati j
SFX 1473 jati jmo
SFX 1473 jati jte
SFX 1473 jati jah
SFX 1473 jati ja
SFX 1473 jati jaše
SFX 1473 jati jasmo
SFX 1473 jati jaste
SFX 1473 jati jahu
SFX 1473 jati javši

SFX 1474 Y 22
SFX 1474 ći ći
SFX 1474 ći đem
SFX 1474 ći đeš
SFX 1474 ći đe
SFX 1474 ći đemo
SFX 1474 ći đete
SFX 1474 ći đu
SFX 1474 ći šao
SFX 1474 ći šla
SFX 1474 ći šlo
SFX 1474 ći šli
SFX 1474 ći šle
SFX 1474 ći đi
SFX 1474 ći đimo
SFX 1474 ći đite
SFX 1474 ći đoh
SFX 1474 ći đe
SFX 1474 ći đoše
SFX 1474 ći đosmo
SFX 1474 ći đoste
SFX 1474 ći đahu
SFX 1474 ći šavši

SFX 1475 Y 29
SFX 1475 jati jati
SFX 1475 jati jim
SFX 1475 jati jiš
SFX 1475 jati ji
SFX 1475 jati jimo
SFX 1475 jati jite
SFX 1475 jati je
SFX 1475 jati jao
SFX 1475 jati jala
SFX 1475 jati jalo
SFX 1475 jati jali
SFX 1475 jati jale
SFX 1475 jati jaću
SFX 1475 jati jaćeš
SFX 1475 jati jaće
SFX 1475 jati jaćemo
SFX 1475 jati jaćete
SFX 1475 jati jaće
SFX 1475 jati j
SFX 1475 jati jmo
SFX 1475 jati jte
SFX 1475 jati jah
SFX 1475 jati ja
SFX 1475 jati ja
SFX 1475 jati jaše
SFX 1475 jati jasmo
SFX 1475 jati jaste
SFX 1475 jati jahu
SFX 1475 jati javši
