Dictionaries/dictionaries-master/sr/sr-Latn.dic
deti/1461
dići/1463
djesti/1464
djeti/1465
dobeći/1467
dobjeći/1469
dobrodoći/1474
dobrojati/1475
doviti/1468
dogrejati/1473
dogudeti/1470
dogudjeti/1471
dolebdjeti/1471
doležati/1466
dosmrdeti/1470
dosmrdjeti/1471
dostajati/1473
doći/1474
zabiti/1468
zabludeti/1470
zabludjeti/1471
zabrijati/1473
zabrojati/1475
zabrujati/1466
zaverglati/1462
zaviti/1468
zavredeti/1470
zavrijedjeti/1471
zagrajati/1473
zagrijati/1473
zagudeti/1470
zadaždjeti/1471
zadobiti/1468
zadrečati/1466
zazvrčati/1466
zaići/1474
zakmečati/1466
zakričati/1466
zalebdjeti/1471
zaleći/1463
zaludeti/1470
zamajati/1473
zamumlati/1462
zanjištati/1466
zaobići/1474
zaprati/1472
zapreći/1463
zaprštati/1466
zarudjeti/1471
zasedeti/1470
zasmejati/1473
zasmrdjeti/1471
zasrati/1472
zastideti/1470
zastrčati/1466
zastudjeti/1471
zaći/1474
zaćutati/1466
zaceptati/1466
zašiti/1468
zaštedeti/1470
zašuštati/1466
zbjeći/1469
zbrati/1472
zbrijati/1473
zbrojati/1475
zgomilati/1462
zgrijati/1473
zdrati/1472
izabrati/1472
izaprati/1472
izaći/1474
izbiflati/1462
izbjeći/1469
izblijedeti/1470
izblijedjeti/1471
izbrati/1472
izbrijati/1473
izbrojati/1475
izverglati/1462
izviti/1468
izvredeti/1470
izvrći/1463
izguglati/1462
izdići/1463
izdrati/1472
izdržati/1466
izići/1474
izlajati/1473
izleći/1463
izludjeti/1471
izmalati/1462
izmiti/1468
izmoći/1463
izmumlati/1462
iznaći/1474
iskovrčati/1466
ismejati/1473
ispeglati/1462
ispilati/1462
ispiti/1468
isprati/1472
isprdeti/1470
israti/1472
išmirglati/1462
mimoići/1474
nabiti/1468
nabiflati/1462
nabrati/1472
nabrojati/1475
navejati/1473
naverglati/1462
naviti/1468
nagomilati/1462
nadbiti/1468
nadbrojati/1475
nadviti/1468
nadzviždati/1466
nadoći/1474
nadrati/1472
naždrati/1472
naići/1474
nalajati/1473
naležati/1466
naleći/1463
namalati/1462
napeglati/1462
naprati/1472
nasjedjeti/1471
nasmejati/1473
naći/1474
našiti/1468
obiti/1468
obići/1474
obnevideti/1470
obrati/1472
ovejati/1473
oguglati/1462
odbeći/1463
odbiti/1468
odbjeći/1469
odbrati/1472
odbrojati/1475
odverglati/1462
odgomilati/1462
odgrejati/1473
odguglati/1462
odići/1463
odležati/1466
odmalati/1462
odmoći/1463
odmumlati/1462
odsedeti/1470
odsjedjeti/1471
odstojati/1475
olajati/1473
opeglati/1462
oprati/1472
opseći/1463
opšiti/1468
orudeti/1470
otklečati/1466
pobeći/1467
pobjeći/1469
pobledeti/1470
poblijedjeti/1471
pobrojati/1475
poviti/1468
pograjati/1473
podviti/1468
podvrći/1463
podleći/1463
podržati/1466
podsaviti/1468
podsmejati/1473
poždrati/1472
požudeti/1470
pozavidjeti/1471
poizdići/1463
poleći/1463
poludeti/1470
pomalati/1462
pomrčati/1466
popridići/1463
poprileći/1463
posedeti/1470
posejati/1473
posijedjeti/1471
posrati/1472
postideti/1470
postidjeti/1471
poći/1474
pociglati/1462
prebdjeti/1471
prebeći/1463
prebjeći/1469
prebledeti/1470
prebrojati/1475
prevazići/1474
prevejati/1473
prevideti/1470
previdjeti/1471
previti/1468
predgrijati/1473
predstojati/1475
preležati/1466
prenagomilati/1462
prepilati/1462
prepoviti/1468
preprati/1472
presedeti/1470
presjedjeti/1471
prestojati/1475
preći/1474
pribeći/1463
pribjeći/1469
pribrati/1472
pribrijati/1473
pribrojati/1475
pridići/1463
pridobiti/1468
pridoći/1474
pridržati/1466
prileći/1463
pripeglati/1462
prisabrati/1472
prismrdeti/1470
prismrdjeti/1471
prići/1474
prišiti/1468
prištedeti/1470
prištedjeti/1471
problijedjeti/1471
probrati/1472
probuktati/1466
provejati/1473
provideti/1470
proždrati/1472
prozvrčati/1466
proizaći/1474
proizići/1474
prokreštati/1466
prolebdjeti/1471
proliptati/1466
promumlati/1462
pronaći/1474
prosedeti/1470
prosejati/1473
prosrati/1472
proći/1474
pročučati/1466
razaviti/1468
razbjeći/1469
razbrati/1472
razbrojati/1475
razvideti/1470
razvidjeti/1471
razvrći/1463
razgrijati/1473
razići/1474
razležati/1466
razleći/1463
razmimoići/1474
raspeglati/1462
raspoviti/1468
reizabrati/1472
sabiti/1468
saprati/1472
saći/1474
sašiti/1468
svrći/1463
sići/1474
smoći/1463
smumlati/1462
snaći/1474
ubazdjeti/1471
ubledeti/1470
ubrati/1472
ubridjeti/1471
ubrojati/1475
ugrejati/1473
udostojati/1475
uzaći/1474
uzbrati/1472
uzbučati/1466
uzviti/1468
uzdići/1463
uzići/1474
uzlajati/1473
uzlebdjeti/1471
uzmoći/1463
uznastojati/1475
uići/1474
uleći/1463
upiti/1468
upreći/1463
usmrdeti/1470
usmrdjeti/1471
uspiti/1468
usceptati/1466
utajati/1473
